Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6120XS (2) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2354 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 562A.9A Assistance animals ââ 1 damage reimbursement ââ deposits ââ misrepresentation. 2 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 3 otherwise requires: 4 a. âAssistance animalâ means the same as defined in section 5 216.8B. 6 b. âEmotional support animalâ means an animal that is 7 covered by the exclusion specified in 24 C.F.R. Â§5.303 and that 8 is not a service animal. 9 c. âService animalâ means the same as defined in section 10 216.8B. 11 d. âTherapy animalâ means an animal that provides 12 therapeutic benefit but is not individually trained to perform 13 tasks for a person with a disability and is not a service 14 animal. 15 2. If a landlord suffers unreimbursed damage to a dwelling 16 unit due to a tenantâs assistance animal, emotional support 17 animal, service animal, or therapy animal, the landlord may 18 seek compensation pursuant to any of the following: 19 a. A landlord may notify the department of revenue of the 20 amount of unreimbursed damage caused to the landlordâs dwelling 21 unit by a tenantâs assistance animal, emotional support animal, 22 service animal, or therapy animal. Upon the landlord providing 23 verification of the amount of damage to the satisfaction of the 24 department of revenue, the department of revenue shall provide 25 notice to the tenant of the claim and provide the tenant 26 opportunity to dispute the amount. If, after providing notice 27 to the tenant and receiving any evidence from the tenant, the 28 department of revenue determines that the landlordâs claim is 29 substantiated, the department of revenue shall use the setoff 30 program pursuant to section 421.65 to pay over to the landlord 31 the amount owed. A landlord shall not request a setoff for the 32 same damages if the landlord is reimbursed pursuant to the tax 33 credit established pursuant to paragraph âbâ or a claim under 34 the insurance pool pursuant to paragraph âcâ . The department of 35 -1- LSB 6120XS (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 6 S.F. 2354 revenue shall adopt rules to administer this paragraph. 1 b. A landlord may claim a tax credit under section 422.12R 2 for unreimbursed damage caused by an assistance animal, 3 emotional support animal, service animal, or therapy animal 4 to the extent that the landlord has not made a claim for 5 reimbursement for the same damage pursuant to paragraph âaâ or 6 âcâ . 7 c. (1) The director of the department of administrative 8 services may establish plans for and procure group insurance to 9 establish a state risk pool for landlords to be reimbursed for 10 damage caused by tenantsâ assistance animals, emotional support 11 animals, service animals, and therapy animals. 12 (2) The funds for such plans shall be created solely from 13 the contributions of participating landlords. All landlords 14 participating in the plan shall be assessed and required to 15 pay an amount to be fixed by the director of the department 16 of administrative services. Participation in the plan is 17 optional. 18 (3) Election to participate shall be in writing on forms 19 provided by the department of administrative services. 20 (4) The director of the department of administrative 21 services may contract with any insurance company having a 22 certificate of authority to transact an insurance business in 23 this state with respect to a group insurance plan. 24 (5) The department of administrative services shall adopt 25 rules to administer this paragraph. 26 3. a. Unless prohibited by state or federal law, a landlord 27 may require a reasonable, refundable damage deposit for an 28 emotional support animal or a therapy animal. 29 b. A deposit collected under this subsection shall only be 30 used for damage beyond ordinary wear and tear. 31 c. A landlord shall not require a damage deposit for a 32 service animal. 33 4. Unless required by federal law, a landlord is not 34 required to allow a tenant to keep in the dwelling unit an 35 -2- LSB 6120XS (2) 91 lh/jh 2/ 6 S.F. 2354 emotional support animal or therapy animal as accommodation 1 that is not a dog. 2 5. a. A person who intentionally misrepresents an animal 3 as an assistance animal, therapy animal, or emotional support 4 animal is guilty of a simple misdemeanor. 5 b. A person commits the offense of intentional 6 misrepresentation of an animal as an assistance animal, therapy 7 animal, or emotional support animal if, for the purpose of 8 obtaining any of the rights or privileges set forth in state or 9 federal law, the person intentionally misrepresents an animal 10 in oneâs possession as oneâs assistance animal, therapy animal, 11 or emotional support animal. 12 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 422.12R Landlord reimbursement tax 13 credit. 14 1. For purposes of this section: 15 a. âAssistance animalâ means the same as defined in section 16 216.8B. 17 b. âDwelling unitâ means the same as defined in section 18 562A.6. 19 c. âEmotional support animalâ means the same as defined in 20 section 562A.9A. 21 d. âLandlordâ means the same as defined in section 562A.6. 22 e. âService animalâ means the same as defined in section 23 562A.9A. 24 f. âTenantâ means the same as defined in section 562A.6. 25 g. âTherapy animalâ means the same as defined in section 26 562A.9A. 27 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits 28 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a landlord 29 reimbursement tax credit. 30 3. The amount of the credit shall be equal to the amount of 31 verifiable damage, above normal wear and tear, to a dwelling 32 unit that was caused by an assistance animal, emotional support 33 animal, service animal, or therapy animal owned by a tenant, 34 to the extent that the damage is not compensated by a damage 35 -3- LSB 6120XS (2) 91 lh/jh 3/ 6 S.F. 2354 deposit or setoff or reimbursement from the risk pool pursuant 1 to section 562A.9A. 2 4. A landlord may claim the credit under this section by 3 providing the department with evidence of the damage caused by 4 the animal to the satisfaction of the department. 5 5. An individual may claim the tax credit allowed a 6 partnership, S corporation, limited liability company, estate, 7 or trust electing to have the income taxed directly to the 8 individual. The amount claimed by the individual shall be 9 based upon the pro rata share of the individualâs earnings of a 10 partnership, S corporation, limited liability company, estate, 11 or trust. 12 6. Any credit in excess of the tax liability is refundable. 13 In lieu of claiming a refund, the taxpayer may elect to have 14 the overpayment shown on the taxpayerâs final, completed return 15 credited to the tax liability for the following tax year. 16 7. The director shall adopt rules to implement this section. 17 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027. 18